Maryland, session 2026, SB0040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0040*

SENATE BILL 40
Article – Education
3–2B–01.
(a) The Baltimore County Board of Education consists of:
(1) Seven nonpartisan elected members;
(2) Four appointed members; and
(3) One student member.
(b) (1) Of the 11 elected and appointed members of the county board:
(i) 1. [One] BEFORE THE 2034 GENERAL ELECTION, ONE
member shall be elected from each of the seven councilmanic districts in the county,
established by the County Council of Baltimore County IN EXISTENCE ON OCTOBER 1,
2024, by the voters of that district; and
2. BEGINNING WITH THE 2034 GENERAL ELECTION, ONE
MEMBER SHALL BE ELECTED FROM EACH OF THE SEVEN SCHOOL BOARD DISTRICTS
ESTABLISHED BY THE REDISTRICTING PROCESS DESCRIBED IN § 3–2B–11 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, BY THE VOTERS OF THAT DISTRICT; AND
(ii) Four members shall be appointed by the Governor from the
county at large.
(2) (i) The seven elected members shall be elected at a general election
in gubernatorial election years in accordance with § 3–2B–02 of this subtitle.
(ii) The four appointed members shall be appointed by the Governor
in presidential election years from a list of nominees submitted by the Baltimore County
School Board Nominating Commission as provided in § 3–2B–03 of this subtitle:
1. On the expiration of the term of an incumbent appointed
member within 30 days after the general election; or
2. Within the 30–day period otherwise required under this
subtitle.
(3) (i) A member from a school board district shall be at least 21 years
old, a resident of that district for at least 2 years, and a registered voter of the county before
the election.

SENATE BILL 40 3
(ii) A member from a district who does not maintain residency in
that district may not continue as a member of the county board and the office shall be
deemed vacant.
(iii) If the boundary line of a district is changed, the term of an
incumbent member of the county board who no longer resides in the district because of the
change is not affected during this term.
(4) (i) A member may not be elected or appointed to serve on the county
board for more than three consecutive terms.
(ii) A member who has served three consecutive 4–year terms may
not be elected or appointed to the county board until at least 4 years have elapsed since the
end of the member’s last term on the county board.
(5) During an election year:
(i) The Governor may not appoint as a member of the county board
an individual who files a certificate of candidacy for election to the county board; and
(ii) An individual who files a certificate of candidacy for election to
the county board may not seek appointment to the county board by the Governor through
nomination by the Baltimore County School Board Nominating Commission.
3–2B–11.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SCHOOL BOARD DISTRICT” MEANS THE GEOGRAPHIC
AREA OF BALTIMORE COUNTY FROM WHICH AN ELECTED MEMBER OF THE
BALTIMORE COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION IS ELECTED.
(B) (1) BEGINNING AFTER THE 2030 U.S. CENSUS, THE SCHOOL BOARD
DISTRICTS SHALL BE:
(I) REAPPORTIONED AFTER EACH DECENNIAL CENSUS OF THE
UNITED STATES; AND
(II) EFFECTIVE FOR EACH GENERAL ELECTION WHERE A
MEMBER WILL BE ELECTED UNTIL THE FOLLOWING DECENNIAL CENSUS.
(2) THE REAPPORTIONED SCHOOL BOARD DISTRICTS UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE SUBSTANTIALLY EQUAL IN POPULATION.
(C) AFTER EACH DECENNIAL CENSUS, THE CHAIR OF THE BALTIMORE
COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL INTRODUCE
LEGISLATION TO REAPPORTION THE SCHOOL BOARD DISTRICTS.

SENATE BILL 40
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.